Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 22. Motor Vehicle Title Loans.
§ 6.2-2215.
Required and prohibited business methods.

Each licensee shall comply with the following requirements and prohibitions:

A licensee shall not make a loan that does not comply with §

6.2-2215.1

;

A licensee shall not charge, collect, or receive, directly or indirectly, credit insurance premiums, charges for any ancillary product sold, charges for disbursing loan proceeds or refunds including check-cashing charges and any other charges for negotiating forms of payment other than cash, charges for brokering or obtaining a loan, or any fees, interest, or charges in connection with a loan, other than fees and charges permitted by §

6.2-2216

;

A licensee shall not make a loan to a person if that person is obligated upon any loan to a person licensed under Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.). Prior to making a loan, a licensee shall make a reasonable attempt to verify the prospective borrower’s eligibility under this section which shall include reviewing the files of any affiliate that is licensed under Chapter 18. Unless the Commission requires otherwise by administrative rule or policy statement, a licensee may rely on the loan applicant’s written representations with respect to the applicant’s obligations to lenders that are licensed under Chapter 18 but are not affiliates of the licensee and a licensee is not subject to any administrative penalty or civil liability if such representations are later determined to be inaccurate;

Except as provided in §

6.2-2216.2

, a licensee shall not refinance, renew, or extend any title loan or make a loan to a person if the loan would cause the person to have more than one title loan from any licensee outstanding at the same time;

Before entering into a motor vehicle title loan, a licensee shall provide each borrower with a pamphlet, in a form consistent with regulations adopted by the Commission, explaining in plain language the rights and responsibilities of the borrower and providing a toll-free number at the Commission for assistance with complaints;

A licensee shall not cause any person to be obligated to the licensee in any capacity at any time in the principal amount of more than $2,500;

A licensee shall not obtain any agreement from the borrower (i) giving the licensee or any third person power of attorney or authority to confess judgment for the borrower; (ii) authorizing the licensee or any third party to bring suit against the borrower in a court outside the Commonwealth; or (iii) waiving the borrower’s right to legal recourse or any other right the borrower has under any otherwise applicable provision of state or federal law;

A motor vehicle title loan agreement shall not (i) contain a provision by which a person acting on behalf of the licensee is treated as an agent of the borrower in connection with its formation or execution other than for purposes of filing or releasing a lien with the state where the motor vehicle is registered or (ii) be sold or otherwise assigned to any other person who is not also a licensee, and if a loan agreement is sold or assigned to another licensee, the buyer or assignee of the loan agreement shall be subject to the same obligations under this chapter that apply to the selling or assigning licensee. If a motor vehicle title loan or its servicing is sold or assigned, a licensee shall provide to the borrower written notice and the information needed to make future payments no later than 10 days before the borrower’s next payment due date;

Loan proceeds shall be disbursed (i) in cash, (ii) by the licensee’s business check, or (iii) by debit card provided that the borrower will not be directly charged a fee by the licensee in connection with the withdrawal of the funds. No fee shall be charged by the licensee or affiliate for cashing a title loan proceeds check;

A licensee shall not (i) accept a check, real or personal property, or any interest in any property other than the title of one motor vehicle owned by the borrower as security for a title loan; (ii) create or accept any remotely created check, as defined in 12 C.F.R. § 229.2(fff), in connection with a loan; (iii) draft funds electronically from a borrower’s account without express written authorization from the borrower; (iv) fail to stop attempts to draft funds electronically from a borrower’s account upon request from the borrower or his agent; or (v) require or accept from a borrower a set of keys to a motor vehicle that secures a loan. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the conversion of a negotiable instrument into an electronic form for processing through the automated clearing house system. For purposes of this subdivision, “motor vehicle” includes any accessories or accessions to a motor vehicle that are affixed thereto;

A licensee shall not attempt to draft funds electronically from a borrower’s account after two consecutive attempts have failed, unless the licensee obtains new written authorization from the borrower to transfer or withdraw funds electronically from the borrower’s account;

A licensee shall not make a motor vehicle title loan if, on the date the loan agreement is signed by the borrower, the motor vehicle’s certificate of title evidences that the motor vehicle is security for another loan or otherwise is encumbered by a lien;

A licensee shall (i) hold the certificate of title to the motor vehicle throughout the period that the loan agreement is in effect and (ii) within seven days following the date of the motor vehicle title loan agreement, file to have its security interest in the motor vehicle added to its certificate of title by complying with the requirements of §

46.2-637

, or in the case of a motor vehicle registered in a state other than the Commonwealth by complying with that state’s requirements for perfecting a security interest in a motor vehicle;

A licensee shall not knowingly make a title loan to a borrower to enable the borrower to (i) pay for any other product or service sold at the licensee’s business location or by an affiliate or (ii) repay any amount owed to the licensee or an affiliate of the licensee in connection with another credit transaction;

A licensee shall conspicuously post in each licensed location (i) a schedule of finance charges on a title loan, using as an example a $1,000 loan that is repaid over a 12-month period and (ii) a notice containing the following statement: “Should you wish to file a complaint against us, you may contact the Bureau of Financial Institutions at [insert contact information].” The Commission shall furnish licensees with the appropriate contact information;

A licensee or affiliate shall not knowingly make a motor vehicle title loan to a covered member of the armed forces or a dependent of such member. Prior to making a motor vehicle title loan, every licensee or affiliate shall inquire of every prospective borrower if the individual is a covered member of the armed forces or a dependent of a covered member. The prospective borrower shall affirm in writing to the licensee or affiliate if he is not a covered member of the armed forces or a dependent of a covered member. For purposes of this section, “covered member of the armed forces” means a person on active duty under a call or order that does not specify a period of 30 days or less or on active guard and reserve duty. For purposes of this section, “dependent of a covered member of the armed forces” means the member’s spouse, the member’s child as defined by 38 U.S.C. § 101(4), or an individual for whom the member provided more than one-half of the individual’s support for 180 days immediately preceding the date the motor vehicle title loan is sought;

In collecting or attempting to collect a motor vehicle title loan, a licensee shall comply with the restrictions and prohibitions applicable to debt collectors contained in the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. § 1692 et seq.) regarding harassment or abuse, false, misleading or deceptive statements or representations, and unfair practices in collections;

A licensee shall not contact a borrower for any reason other than (i) for the borrower’s benefit regarding upcoming payments, options for obtaining loans, payment options, payment due dates, the effect of default, or, after default, receiving payments or other actions permitted by the licensee; (ii) to advise the borrower of missed payments or dishonored checks; (iii) to advise the borrower regarding a repossessed or surrendered vehicle; or (iv) to assist the transmittal of payments via a third-party mechanism;

A licensee shall not make a loan to a borrower that includes an acceleration clause or a demand feature that permits the licensee, in the event the borrower fails to meet the repayment terms for any outstanding balance, to terminate the loan in advance of the original maturity date and to demand repayment of the entire outstanding balance, unless both of the following conditions are met: (i) not earlier than 10 days after the borrower’s payment was due, the licensee provides written notice to the borrower of the termination of the loan and (ii) in addition to the outstanding balance, the licensee collects only prorated interest and the fees earned up to the date the loan was terminated or the borrower’s vehicle was repossessed or surrendered, whichever is earlier. For purposes of this subsection, the outstanding balance and prorated interest and fees shall be calculated as if the borrower had voluntarily prepaid the loan in full on the date of termination, repossession, or surrender;

A licensee shall not recommend to a borrower that the borrower obtain a loan for a dollar amount that is higher than the borrower has requested;

A licensee shall not (i) engage in any unfair, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent acts or practices in the conduct of its business or (ii) threaten, or cause to be instigated, criminal proceedings against a borrower arising from the borrower’s failure to pay any sum due under a loan agreement;

A licensee shall provide a safe place for the keeping of all certificates of title while they are in its possession;

A licensee may require a borrower to purchase or maintain property insurance upon a motor vehicle securing a title loan made pursuant to this chapter. A licensee may not require the borrower to obtain such insurance from a particular provider; and

If a licensee or any person acting at its direction takes possession of a motor vehicle securing a title loan, the vehicle and any personal items in it shall be stored in a secure location.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-495; 2011, c. 418; 2016, c. 501; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 418 corrected a duplicate clause designation in subdivision 1 c; substituted “state where the motor vehicle is registered” for “Department of Motor Vehicles” in clause (i) of subdivision 6; and added the language beginning “or in the case of a motor vehicle registered in a state” at the end of subdivision 11.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 501, in subdivision 1 c, substituted “Consumer Financial Protection Bureau” for “Federal Reserve Board’s”; and inserted “(12 C.F.R. Part 1026).”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For note, “Taming Title Loans,” see 101 Va. L. Rev. 1753 (2015).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Disbursement of proceeds. —

A motor vehicle title lender may not disburse loan proceeds through a debit card transaction in which the borrower’s bank account is credited with the amount of the loan. A motor vehicle title lender may not disburse loan proceeds through an electronic funds transfer to the borrower’s deposit account. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John C. Watkins, Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-072, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/11/13).

§ 6.2-2215.1.
Loan terms and conditions.

A licensee may engage in the business of making motor vehicle title loans provided that each loan meets all of the following conditions:

The total amount of the loan does not exceed $2,500.

The minimum duration of the loan is six months and the maximum duration of the loan is 24 months; however, the minimum duration of the loan may be less than six months if the total monthly payment on the loan does not exceed the greater of an amount that is (i) five percent of the borrower’s verified gross monthly income or (ii) six percent of the borrower’s verified net monthly income.

The loan is made pursuant to a written loan contract that sets forth the terms and conditions of the loan, which shall be signed by the borrower and a person authorized by the licensee to sign such agreements and dated the same day the loan is made and disbursed. A copy of the signed loan contract shall be provided to the borrower. The loan contract shall disclose in a clear and concise manner all of the following:

The principal amount of the loan and the total amount of fees and charges the borrower will be required to pay in connection with the loan pursuant to the loan contract.

The amount of each payment of principal and interest, when each payment is due, the total number of payments that the borrower will be required to make under the loan contract, and the loan’s maturity date.

The make, model, year, and vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle in which a security interest is being given as security for the loan, and the fair market value of the vehicle which value the licensee shall determine by reference to the value for the motor vehicle specified in a recognized pricing guide if the motor vehicle is included in a recognized pricing guide.

A statement, printed in a minimum font size of 10 points, that informs the borrower that complaints regarding the loan or lender may be submitted to the Bureau and includes the correct telephone number, website address, and mailing address for the Bureau.

Any disclosures required under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations, as they may be amended from time to time.

The annual percentage rate.

A statement, printed in a minimum font size of 10 points, as follows: “This loan is made pursuant to Chapter 22 of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia. You have the right to rescind or cancel this loan by returning the loan proceeds check or the originally contracted loan amount by 5 p.m. of the third business day immediately following the day you enter into this contract.”

A statement, printed in a minimum font size of 10 points, as follows: “Electronic payment is optional. You have the right to revoke or remove your authorization for electronic payment at any time.”

The borrower’s mailing address.

A statement, printed in at least 14-point bold type immediately above the borrower’s signature, as follows:YOU ARE PLEDGING YOUR MOTOR VEHICLE AS COLLATERAL FOR THIS LOAN. IF YOU FAIL TO REPAY THE LOAN PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT, WE MAY REPOSSESS YOUR MOTOR VEHICLE.UNLESS YOU CONCEAL OR INTENTIONALLY DAMAGE THE MOTOR VEHICLE, OR OTHERWISE IMPAIR OUR SECURITY INTEREST BY PLEDGING THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO A THIRD PARTY OR PLEDGING A MOTOR VEHICLE TO US THAT IS ALREADY SUBJECT TO AN UNDISCLOSED EXISTING LIEN, YOUR LIABILITY FOR DEFAULTING UNDER THIS LOAN IS LIMITED TO THE LOSS OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.IF YOUR MOTOR VEHICLE IS SOLD DUE TO YOUR DEFAULT, YOU ARE ENTITLED TO ANY SURPLUS OBTAINED AT SUCH SALE BEYOND WHAT IS OWED PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT ALONG WITH ANY REASONABLE COSTS OF RECOVERY AND SALE.

Such other information relating to the loan as the Commission shall determine, by regulation, is necessary to ensure that the borrower is provided adequate notice of the relevant provisions of the loan.

The loan is a precomputed loan and is payable in substantially equal installments consisting of principal, fees, and interest combined. For purposes of this section, “precomputed loan” means a loan in which the debt is a sum comprising the principal amount and the amount of fees and interest computed in advance on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made when due.

The loan may be rescinded or canceled on or before 5 p.m. of the third business day immediately following the day of the loan transaction upon the borrower returning the original loan proceeds check or paying to the licensee, in the form of cash or other good funds instrument, the loan proceeds.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2216.
Authorized fees and charges.

A licensee may charge, collect, and receive only the following fees and charges in connection with a motor vehicle title loan, provided such fees and charges are set forth in the written loan contract described in §

6.2-2215.1

:

Interest at a simple annual rate not to exceed 36 percent;

Subject to §

6.2-2216.1

, a monthly maintenance fee that does not exceed the lesser of eight percent of the originally contracted loan amount or $15, provided the fee is not added to the loan balance on which interest is charged;

Any deposit item return fee incurred by the licensee, not to exceed $25, if a borrower’s check or electronic draft is returned because the account on which it was drawn was closed by the borrower or contained insufficient funds, or the borrower stopped payment of the check or electronic draft;

Damages and costs to which the licensee may become entitled to by law in connection with any civil action to collect a loan after default, except that the total amount of damages and costs shall not exceed the originally contracted loan amount;

Reasonable costs of repossession and sale of the motor vehicle in accordance with §

6.2-2217

, provided that the total amount of such costs of repossession and sale that a licensee or any person working on its behalf may charge or receive from the borrower shall be limited to an amount equal to five percent of the originally contracted loan amount; and

A late charge in accordance with the provisions of §

6.2-400

provided that the late charge shall not exceed $20.

Notwithstanding anything set forth in subsection A, other provisions of this chapter, or in a motor vehicle title loan agreement, interest shall not accrue on the principal balance of a motor vehicle title loan from and after:

The date that the motor vehicle securing the title loan is repossessed by or at the direction of the licensee; or

Sixty days after the borrower has failed to make a monthly payment on a motor vehicle title loan as required by the loan agreement unless the borrower has not surrendered the motor vehicle and the borrower is concealing the motor vehicle.

A licensee shall not be entitled to collect or recover from a borrower any sum otherwise permitted pursuant to §

6.2-302

,

8.01-27.2

, or

8.01-382

. In no event shall the borrower be liable for fees incurred in connection with the storage of a motor vehicle securing a title loan.

If any person causes a borrower to pay fees related to repossession or sale of the motor vehicle in excess of the amount allowed under subdivision A 5, or any fee to store the motor vehicle, the borrower shall be entitled to recover such amounts or fees from the licensee upon presenting a valid receipt.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-496; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the section.

§ 6.2-2216.1.
Inflation adjustment of maximum monthly maintenance fee.

The Commission may, from time to time, by regulation, adjust the dollar amount of $15 specified in subdivision A 2 of §

6.2-2216

to reflect the rate of inflation from the previous date that the dollar amount was established, as measured by the Consumer Price Index or other method of measuring the rate of inflation which the Commission determines is reliable and generally accepted.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2216.2.
Refinancing of motor vehicle title loan.

Subject to subsection F of §

6.2-2216.3

, a licensee may refinance a title loan, provided that the refinanced loan is also a title loan.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2216.3.
Statement of balance due; repayment and refunds.

The licensee shall, upon the request of the borrower or his agent, provide a statement of balance due on a motor vehicle title loan.

A borrower shall be permitted to make partial payments, in increments of not less than $5, on the loan at any time prior to maturity, without charge. The licensee shall give the borrower dated receipts for each payment made, which shall state the updated balance due on the loan.

When providing a statement of balance due on the loan, the licensee shall state the amount required to discharge the borrower’s obligation in full as of the date the notice is provided and for each of the next three business days following that date. If the licensee cannot reasonably supply a firm statement of balance due when requested or required, the licensee may provide a good faith estimate of the balance due immediately and provide to the borrower or his agent a firm statement of balance due within two business days.

The licensee shall provide any statement of balance due verbally and in writing, and shall not fail to provide the information by phone upon the request of the borrower or his agent.

A licensee shall not fail to accept cash or other good funds instrument from the borrower, or a third party when submitted on behalf of the borrower, for repayment of a title loan in full or in part. Payments shall be credited by the licensee on the date received.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a title loan is prepaid in full or refinanced prior to the loan’s maturity date, the licensee shall refund to the borrower a prorated portion of loan charges based on a ratio of the number of days the loan was outstanding and the number of days for which the loan was originally contracted. For purposes of this section, all charges made in connection with the loan shall be included when calculating the loan charges except for deposit item return fees, late charges, and reasonable costs of repossession and sale authorized under §

6.2-2216

.

The licensee shall provide any refund due to a borrower in the form of cash or business check as soon as reasonably possible and not later than two business days after receiving payment from the borrower.

Upon repayment of the loan in full, the licensee shall (i) mark the original loan agreement with the word “paid” or “canceled,” return it to the borrower, and retain a copy in its records and (ii) promptly release any security interest in a motor vehicle.

When releasing a security interest in a motor vehicle, a licensee shall (i) take any action necessary to reflect the termination of its lien on the motor vehicle’s certificate of title and (ii) promptly return the certificate of title to the borrower.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2216.4.
Restriction on certain fees and charges.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a licensee shall not contract for, charge, collect, or receive in connection with a motor vehicle title loan a total amount of fees and charges that exceeds either (i) 50 percent of the originally contracted loan amount, if the originally contracted loan amount was $1,500 or less, or (ii) 60 percent of the originally contracted loan amount, if the originally contracted loan amount was greater than $1,500. For purposes of this section, all charges made in connection with the loan shall be included when calculating the total loan charges except for deposit item return fees, late charges, and reasonable costs of repossession and sale authorized under §

6.2-2216

.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2216.5.
Verification of borrower’s income.

Before initiating a motor vehicle title loan transaction with a borrower, a licensee shall make a reasonable attempt to verify the borrower’s income. At a minimum, the licensee shall obtain from the borrower one or more recent pay stubs or other written evidence of recurring income, such as a bank statement. The written evidence shall include at least one document that, when presented to the licensee, is dated not earlier than 45 days prior to the borrower’s initiation of the title loan transaction.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2217.
Limited recourse; repossession and sale of motor vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection E, a licensee taking a security interest in a motor vehicle pursuant to this chapter shall be limited, upon default by the borrower, to seeking repossession of, preparing for sale, and selling the motor vehicle in accordance with Title 8.9A. Unless (i) the licensee, at least 10 days prior to repossessing the motor vehicle securing a title loan, has sent to the borrower, by first class mail, written notice advising the borrower that his title loan is in default and stating that the motor vehicle may be repossessed unless the principal and interest owed under the loan agreement are paid and (ii) the borrower does not pay such principal and interest prior to the date the motor vehicle is repossessed by or at the direction of the licensee, then the licensee shall not collect or charge the costs of repossessing and selling the motor vehicle described in subdivision A 5 of §

6.2-2216

. A licensee shall not repossess a motor vehicle securing a title loan prior to the date specified in the notice. Except as otherwise provided in subsection E, a licensee shall not seek or obtain a personal money judgment against a borrower for any amount owed under a loan agreement or any deficiency resulting after the sale of a motor vehicle.

At least 15 days prior to the sale of a motor vehicle, a licensee shall (i) notify the borrower of the date and time after which the motor vehicle is subject to sale and (ii) provide the borrower with a written accounting of the redemption amount, which shall be the sum of the principal amount due to the licensee, interest accrued through the date the licensee took possession of the motor vehicle, and any reasonable expenses incurred to date by the licensee in taking possession of, preparing for sale, and selling the motor vehicle. At any time prior to such sale, the licensee shall permit the borrower to redeem the motor vehicle by tendering cash or other good funds instrument for the principal amount due to the licensee, interest accrued through the date the licensee took possession, and any allowable fees or costs of repossessing and selling the motor vehicle described in subdivision A 5 of §

6.2-2216

. Borrowers shall be permitted to recover personal items from repossessed motor vehicles promptly and at no cost.

Within 10 days of the licensee’s receipt of funds from the sale of a motor vehicle, the borrower is entitled to receive all proceeds from such sale of the motor vehicle in excess of the redemption amount included in the notice described in subsection B, less any additional allowable fees or costs of repossessing and selling the motor vehicle described in subdivision A 5 of §

6.2-2216

that were not included in the redemption amount.

Except in the case of fraud or a voluntary surrender of the motor vehicle, a licensee shall not take possession of a motor vehicle until such time as a borrower is in default under the loan agreement. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the repossession and sale of a motor vehicle shall be subject to the provisions of Title 8.9A.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, but subject to §

6.2-2216

, upon default by a borrower, a licensee may seek a personal money judgment against the borrower for any amounts owed under a loan agreement if the borrower impairs the licensee’s security interest by (i) intentionally damaging or destroying the motor vehicle, (ii) intentionally concealing the motor vehicle, (iii) giving the licensee a lien in a motor vehicle that is already encumbered by an undisclosed prior lien, or (iv) subsequently giving a security interest in, or selling, a motor vehicle that secures a title loan to a third party, without the licensee’s written consent.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-497; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and
in subsection A, substituted “subdivision A 5” for “clause (ii) of subsection D” near the end of the second sentence; in subsection B, inserted “redemption amount, which shall be the sum of the” in the first sentence in clause (ii), substituted “allowable fees or costs of repossessing and selling the motor vehicle described in subdivision A 5 of §

6.2-2216

” for “reasonable expenses incurred by the licensee in taking possession of, preparing for sale, and selling the motor vehicle” in the penultimate sentence and added the last sentence; in subsection C, substituted “10 days” for “30 days” and “redemption amount included in the notice described in subsection B, less any additional allowable fees or costs of repossessing and selling the motor vehicle described in subdivision A 5 of §

6.2-2216

that were not included in the redemption amount” for “principal amount due to the licensee, interest accrued through the date the licensee took possession, and the reasonable expenses incurred by the licensee in taking possession of, preparing for sale, and selling the motor vehicle”; and in subsection E, inserted “but subject to §

6.2-2216

.”

§ 6.2-2218.
Advertising.

No person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter shall use or cause to be published any advertisement that (i) contains any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation or (ii) identifies the person by any name other than the name set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

Any advertising materials used to promote the price, cost, or interest rate of motor vehicle title loans shall disclose the amount of any minimum monthly payments and a statement of finance charges, expressed as an annual percentage rate, payable using as an example a $1,000 loan that is repaid over a 12-month period. In any print media advertisement, including any web page, used to promote motor vehicle title loans, the disclosure shall be conspicuous. “Conspicuous” shall have the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) (14) of § 59.1-501.2. If a single advertisement consists of multiple pages, folds, or faces, the disclosure requirement applies only to one page, fold, or face. In a television advertisement used to promote motor vehicle title loans, the visual disclosure legend shall include 20 scan lines in size. In a radio advertisement or advertisement communicated by telephone used to promote motor vehicle title loans, the disclosure statement shall last at least two seconds and the statement shall be spoken so that its contents may be easily understood.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-498.

§ 6.2-2218.1.
Other business.

A licensee shall not conduct the business of making motor vehicle title loans under this chapter at any office, suite, room, or place of business where any other business is solicited or conducted except a registered check cashing business, a short-term loan business licensed under Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.), or such other business as the Commission determines should be permitted, and subject to such conditions as the Commission deems necessary and in the public interest. No such other business shall be allowed except as permitted by Commission regulation or upon the filing of a written application with the Commission, payment of a $300 fee, or other reasonable amount that the Commissioner may set, and provision of such information as the Commission may deem pertinent. The Commission shall not, however, permit the sale of insurance or the enrolling of borrowers under group insurance policies. This section shall not apply to any other business that is transacted solely with persons residing outside the Commonwealth.

History.

2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

§ 6.2-2219.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The Commission may suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter upon any of the following grounds:

Any ground for denial of a license under this chapter;

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or a violation of any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s business;

A course of conduct consisting of the failure to perform written agreements with borrowers;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a judgment against the licensee involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a federal or state administrative order against the licensee for violation of any law or any regulation applicable to the conduct of his business;

Refusal to permit an investigation or examination by the Commission;

Failure to pay any fee or assessment imposed by this chapter; or

Failure to comply with any order of the Commission.

For the purposes of this section, acts of any officer, director, member, partner, trustee, beneficiary, or principal shall be deemed acts of the licensee.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-499.

§ 6.2-2220.
Cease and desist orders.

If the Commission determines that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or violated any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of a licensee’s business, the Commission may, upon 21 days’ notice in writing, order such person to cease and desist from such practices and to comply with the provisions of this chapter. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of such person or other address authorized under §

12.1-19.1

and shall state the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person or persons named therein may file with the Clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not issue a cease and desist order except based upon findings made at such hearing. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Commission’s Rules of Practice and Procedure. The Commission may enforce compliance with any order issued under this section by imposition and collection of such fines and penalties as may be prescribed by law.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-500.

§ 6.2-2221.
Notice of proposed suspension or revocation.

The Commission shall not revoke or suspend the license of any person licensed under this chapter upon any of the grounds set forth in §

6.2-2219

until it has given the licensee 21 days’ notice in writing of the reasons for the proposed revocation or suspension and an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of the licensee or other address authorized under §

12.1-19.1

and shall state with particularity the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person or persons named therein may file with the Clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not suspend or revoke the license except based upon findings made at such hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Commission’s Rules of Practice and Procedure.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-501.